Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4700.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 107. (1) "Cash" means money in hand, bank notes, demand deposits at a bank, or legal tender, that a creditor must accept according to law. Cash does not include call loans, postdated checks, or promissory notes. (2) "Class C license" means a place licensed to sell at retail beer, wine, mixed spirit drink, and spirits for consumption on the premises. (2) "Church" means an entire house or structure set apart primarily for use for purposes of public worship, that is tax exempt under the laws of this state, and in which religious services are held with which a clergyman is associated, and the entire structure of which is kept for that use and not put to any other use inconsistent with that use. (3) "Class A hotel" means a hotel licensed by the commission to sell beer, wine, and mixed spirit drink for consumption on the premises only that provides for the rental of, and maintains the availability for rental of, 20 or more rooms. (4) "Class B hotel" means a hotel licensed by the commission to sell beer, wine, mixed spirit drink, and spirits for consumption on the premises only that provides for the rental of, and maintains the availability for rental of, 20 or more rooms. (5) "Class C license" means a place licensed to sell at retail beer, wine, mixed spirit drink, and spirits for consumption on the premises. (6) (3) "Class G-1 license" means a place licensed to sell at retail beer, wine, mixed spirit drink, and spirits for consumption on the premises at a golf course having at least 18 holes that measure at least 5,000 yards and which license is issued only to a facility that permits member access by means of payments that include annual paid membership fees. (7) (4) "Class G-2 license" means a place licensed to sell at retail beer, wine, and mixed spirit drink for consumption on the premises at a golf course having at least 18 holes that measure at least 5,000 yards and which license is issued only to a facility that permits member access by means of payments that include annual paid membership fees. (8) (5) "Club" means a nonprofit association, whether incorporated or unincorporated, organized for the promotion of some common purpose, the object of which is owning, hiring, or leasing a building, or space in a building, of an extent and character as in the judgment of the commission may be suitable and adequate for the reasonable and comfortable use and accommodation of its members and their guests, but does not include an association organized for a commercial or business purpose. (9) (6) "Commission" means the liquor control commission created in section 209. (7) "Church" means an entire house or structure set apart primarily for use for purposes of public worship, and that is tax exempt under the laws of this state, and in which religious services are held and with which a clergyman is associated, and the entire structure of which is kept for that use and not put to any other use inconsistent with that use. (10) (8) "Distiller" means a person licensed to manufacture and sell spirits or alcohol, or both, of any kind. (11) "Financial records" means any document or summary of information contained in a document, including electronic documents, that contains information about the financial activities or position of a person, including, but not limited to, information about the person's assets, balance sheets, budgets, cash flow, earnings, revenue, expenditures, income, investments, losses, liabilities, payroll, profits, retained earnings, or taxes. (12) (9) "Hotel" means a building or group of buildings located on the same or adjoining pieces of real property, that provide lodging to travelers and temporary residents and that may also provide food service and other goods and services to registered guests and to the public. (10) "Class A hotel" means a hotel licensed by the commission to sell beer, wine, and mixed spirit drink for consumption on the premises only, that provides for the rental of, and maintains the availability for rental of, not less than 25 bedrooms if located in a local governmental unit with a population of less than 175,000 or not less than 50 bedrooms if located in a local governmental unit with a population of 175,000 or more. (11) "Class B hotel" means a hotel licensed by the commission to sell beer, wine, mixed spirit drink, and spirits for consumption on the premises only, that provides for the rental of, and maintains the availability for rental of, not less than 25 bedrooms if located in a local governmental unit with a population of less than 175,000 or not less than 50 bedrooms if located in a local governmental unit with a population of 175,000 or more. (12) "Financial records" means any document or summary of information contained in a document, including electronic documents, that contains information about the financial activities or position of a person including, but not limited to, information about the assets, balance sheets, budgets, cash flow, earnings, revenue, expenditures, income, investments, losses, liabilities, payroll, profits, retained earnings, or taxes. (13) "License" means a contract between the commission and the licensee granting authority to that licensee to manufacture and sell, sell, or warehouse alcoholic liquor in the manner provided by this act.